Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB578.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 1, 1984 (P.L.206, No.43), known as the Pennsylvania Safe Drinking Water Act, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.1. Maximum contaminant levels.(a) Level.--Notwithstanding section 4(a) and except as provided under subsection (b), the maximum contaminant level for polyfluoroalkyl and perfluorinated substances, including, but not limited to, perfluorooctane sulfonate, perfluorooctanoic acid, perfluorononanoic acid and perfluorohexane sulfonic acid, shall not exceed 10 parts per trillion.(b) Testing.--If a maximum contaminant level for a substance 123456789101112131415161718 under subsection (a) is established by the Environmental Quality Board, an executive order of the Governor or the United States Environmental Protection Agency, the maximum contaminant level shall supersede the maximum contaminant level under subsection (a).(c) Publication.--If a maximum contaminant level is established under subsection (b), the department shall transmit notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0578PN0580 - 2 - 12345678910